District of Columbia statutes.
10-1601.32

Limitation on contribution of bond proceeds and expenditure of funds.

(a)

The District’s contribution of bond proceeds from public financing to the project budget, and the expenditure of funds, for the construction of the ballpark shall not exceed $300 million for the hard costs and $175,184,218 for the soft costs.

(b)

The expenditure limits of $300 million and $175,184,218 shall include public funds from any source expended by the District government or any of its independent agencies or instrumentalities.

History

Oct. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-22, § 3, 54 DCR 8006

Section References

This section is referenced in § 10-1601.05 and § 10-1601.33.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3 of Ballpark Hard and Soft Costs Cap and Ballpark Lease Conditional Approval Temporary Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-115, June 9, 2006, law notification 53 DCR 5353).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3 of Ballpark Hard and Soft Costs Cap Temporary Act of 2007 (D.C. Law 17-1, April 18, 2007, law notification 54 DCR 6580).